Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3086.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 35-23-2, 35-23-4 and 35-23-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-
23 entitled "Rhode Island Secure Choice Retirement Savings Program Act" are hereby amended to
read as follows:
35-23-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Eligible employee” means a person age eighteen (18) years or older who is employed
by an eligible or optional employer and has been employed for a period of not less than one hundred
twenty (120) days. “Eligible employee” does not include:
(i) Any employee covered under the federal Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. §§ 151—164
and 45 U.S.C §§ 181—188), or any employee engaged in interstate commerce not subject to the
legislative powers of the state, except insofar as application of this chapter is authorized under the
United States Constitution or laws of the United States; or
(ii) Any employee on whose behalf an employer makes contributions to a Taft-Hartley
pension trust fund.
(2) “Eligible employer” means a person or entity engaged in a business, industry,
profession, trade, or other enterprise in the state, whether for-profit or not-for-profit, excluding the
federal government, the state, any municipal corporation, or any of the state’s units or
instrumentalities, that has five (5) or more employees and that satisfies the requirements to establish

or participate in a payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement. “Eligible employer” does not
include an employer that provides a tax-qualified retirement savings program as described in § 35-
23-9.
(3) “IRA” means an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity under
26 U.S.C § 408 or § 408A (the federal Internal Revenue Code).
(4) "Optional employee" means a person age eighteen (18) years or older that is not
employed by an eligible employer but has elected to enroll in the program.
(4)(5) “Optional employer” means a person or entity engaged in a business, industry,
profession, trade, or other enterprise in the state, whether for-profit or not-for-profit, excluding the
federal government, the state, any municipal corporation, or any of the state’s units or
instrumentalities, that has under five (5) employees.
(5)(6) “Participating employer” means an eligible or optional employer that provides a
payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement provided for by this chapter for eligible employees.
(6)(7) “Payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement” means an arrangement by which
an employer allows employees to remit payroll deduction contributions to the RISavers retirement
savings program.
(7)(8) “RISavers retirement savings program” or “program” means a retirement savings
program offered by the Rhode Island secure choice retirement savings program.
(8)(9) “State investment commission” or “commission” means the state investment
commission established pursuant to the provisions of § 35-10-1.
35-23-4. Investments.
(a) The office of the general treasurer may select an appropriate third-party administrator(s)
for the program and shall adopt such plan, trust, and/or custodial documents, with such features
and attributes as the office of the general treasurer determines necessary or advisable in its
discretion to effectuate the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the following:
(1) The office of the general treasurer may select one or more firm(s) or company(ies) to
provide retirement program investments, program administration, and communication services to
employees who participate in the retirement savings program. The program shall provide for
appropriate long-term retirement-oriented investments and shall include investment options as
determined by the state investment commission. In determining the firm(s) or the company(ies) to
provide these services, the office of the general treasurer shall consider the following:
(i) The financial stability of the company or firm;
(ii) The cost of the investments, program administration, and services to the members;
(iii) The experience of the company or firm in administering retirement savings plans;
LC004672 - Page 2 of 6

(iv) The experience of the company or firm in providing education, counseling, and advice
to participants of retirement savings plans; and
(v) Any criminal convictions, securities or antitrust law violations, material civil or
regulatory fines or judgments against the company or firm which the company or firm shall be
required to disclose to the office of the general treasurer and the commission as part of the selection
process.
(2) The program shall provide education, counseling, and objective employee-specific plan
advice to participants.
(3) The program shall include a limited number of investment options that shall include
either:
(i) Investment portfolio options that are constructed to reflect different risk profiles such
as conservative, moderate, and aggressive; and/or
(ii) Options constructed to reflect different risk profiles that automatically reallocate and
rebalance contributions as an employee ages. There shall be investment options that prioritize the
securities of companies that demonstrate good governance; efficient use of environmental
resources; and thoughtful management of social impact. All investment offerings shall be approved
considered by the state investment commission no less than once every three (3) years.
(b) The Rhode Island secure choice retirement savings program is an instrumentality of the
state. Any security issued, managed, or invested by the state investment commission within the
Rhode Island secure choice retirement savings program on behalf of an individual participating
within the RISavers retirement savings program shall be state income tax deferred for investment
earnings to include interest, dividends, and capital gains until such time as withdrawal pursuant to
the terms of this chapter.
(c) The third-party administrator(s) shall adopt a written statement of investment policy
that includes a risk management and oversight program. The state investment commission shall
consider the statement of investment policy and any changes in the investment policy at a public
meeting no less than once every three (3) years.
35-23-9. Employer participation.
(a) After the office of the general treasurer opens the RISavers retirement savings program
for enrollment, eligible employers shall have a payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement to
allow employee participation in the program under the terms and conditions prescribed by the office
of the general treasurer.
(b) Within twelve (12) months after the office of the general treasurer opens the program
for enrollment, eligible employers with more than one hundred (100) eligible employees and that
LC004672 - Page 3 of 6

do not offer a retirement savings program pursuant to subsection (g) of this section shall have a
payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement to allow employee participation in the program.
(c) Within twenty-four (24) months after the office of the general treasurer opens the
program for enrollment, eligible employers with more than fifty (50) eligible employees and that
do not offer a retirement savings program pursuant to subsection (g) of this section shall have a
payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement to allow employee participation in the program.
(d) Within thirty-six (36) months after the office of the general treasurer opens the program
for enrollment, all other eligible employers that do not offer a retirement savings program pursuant
to subsection (g) of this section shall have a payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement to allow
employee participation in the program.
(e) The office of the general treasurer, in its discretion, may extend the time limits defined
in subsections (b) through (d) of this section.
(f)(1) Each eligible employee shall be enrolled in the program unless the employee elects
not to participate in the program. An eligible employee may elect to opt out of the program at any
time by making a notation on the opt-out form.
(2) Following initial implementation of the program pursuant to this section, at least once
every year, the office of the general treasurer shall designate an open enrollment period during
which eligible employees that previously opted-out of the program may enroll in the program.
(3) An employee who elects to opt out of the program who subsequently elects to
participate through the employer’s payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement may enroll at
any time.
(g)(1) An employer that provides an employer-sponsored retirement plan, such as a defined
benefit plan or a 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), simplified employee pension (SEP) plan, or savings
incentive match plan for employees (SIMPLE) plan, or that offers an automatic enrollment a payroll
deduction IRA, shall be exempt from the requirements of the RISavers retirement savings program,
if the plan or IRA qualifies for favorable federal income tax treatment under the federal Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) An employer shall retain the option at all times to set up and offer a tax-qualified
retirement plan, instead of facilitating employee participation in the RISavers retirement savings
program.
(h)(1) Following initial implementation of the program pursuant to this section, and at least
once every year, the general treasurer shall designate an open enrollment period during which
optional employers employees may enroll in the program.
(2) An optional employer employee that enrolls in the program may elect to opt out of
LC004672 - Page 4 of 6

withdraw from the program upon thirty (30) days’ notice provided to employees their employer
and to the office of the general treasurer.
(i) By regulation, the office of the general treasurer may set a default contribution rate,
unless otherwise specified by the employee. Employees shall have the ability to change their
contribution rate at any time with thirty (30) days’ notice provided to the office of the general
treasurer.
SECTION 2. Chapter 35-23 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Secure Choice
Retirement Savings Program Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
35-23-19. Severability.
The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held
unconstitutional or are found to be preempted by federal law or by any court of competent
jurisdiction, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004672
========
LC004672 - Page 5 of 6